California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(a) In any case in which a social worker, after investigation of an application for petition or other investigation he or she is authorized to make, determines that a child is within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or will probably soon be within that jurisdiction, the social worker may, in lieu of filing a petition or subsequent to dismissal of a petition already filed, and with consent of the child’s parent or guardian, undertake a program of supervision of the child. If a program of supervision is undertaken, the social worker shall attempt to ameliorate the situation that brings the child within, or creates the probability that the child will be within, the jurisdiction of Section 300 by providing or arranging
 to contract for all appropriate child welfare services pursuant to Sections 16506 and 16507.3, within the time periods specified in those sections. No further child welfare services shall be provided subsequent to these time limits. If the family has refused to cooperate with the services being provided, the social worker may file a petition with the juvenile court pursuant to Section 332. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the social worker from filing a petition pursuant to Section 332 when otherwise authorized by law.

(b) The program of supervision of the child undertaken pursuant to this section may call for the child to obtain care and treatment for the misuse of, or addiction to, controlled substances from a county mental health service or other appropriate community agency.

(c) If the parent is a dependent, nonminor dependent, or ward of the juvenile court at the time that a social worker seeks to undertake a program of supervision pursuant to subdivision (a), including a voluntary family reunification program or a voluntary family maintenance program, and if counsel has been appointed for the parent pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 317, the program of supervision shall not be undertaken until the parent has consulted with his or her counsel. In cases when a ward is not represented by counsel appointed in a dependency proceeding pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 317, he or she shall be given the opportunity to confer with counsel appointed in the wardship proceeding pursuant to Section 634 or by counsel retained to represent the ward in the wardship
 proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 666, Sec. 1.   (AB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

302.

(a) A juvenile court may assume jurisdiction over a child described in Section 300 regardless of whether the child was in the physical custody of both parents or was in the sole legal or physical custody of only one parent at the time that the events or conditions occurred that brought the child within the jurisdiction of the court.

(b) Unless their parental rights have been terminated, both parents shall be notified of all proceedings involving the child. In any case where the social worker is required to provide a parent or guardian with notice of a proceeding at which the social worker intends to present a report, the social worker shall also
 provide both parents, whether custodial or noncustodial, or any guardian, or the counsel for the parent or guardian a copy of the report prior to the hearing, by personal service, by first-class mail, or by electronic service pursuant to Section 212.5. The social worker shall not charge any fee for providing a copy of a report required by this subdivision. The social worker shall keep confidential the address of any parent who is known to be the victim of domestic violence.

(c) When a child is adjudged a dependent of the juvenile court, any issues regarding custodial rights between his or her parents shall be determined solely by the juvenile court, as specified in Sections 304, 361.2, and 362.4, so long as the child remains a dependent of the juvenile court.

(d) Any
 custody or visitation order issued by the juvenile court at the time the juvenile court terminates its jurisdiction pursuant to Section 362.4 regarding a child who has been previously adjudged to be a dependent child of the juvenile court shall be a final judgment and shall remain in effect after that jurisdiction is terminated. The order shall not be modified in a proceeding or action described in Section 3021 of the Family Code unless the court finds that there has been a significant change of circumstances since the juvenile court issued the order and modification of the order is in the best interests of the child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 319, Sec. 126.   (AB 976)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

303.

(a) The court may retain jurisdiction over any person who is found to be a ward or a dependent child of the juvenile court until the ward or dependent child attains 21 years of age.

(b) The court shall have within its jurisdiction any nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. The court may terminate its dependency, delinquency, or transition jurisdiction over the nonminor dependent between the time the nonminor reaches the age of majority and 21 years of age. If the court terminates dependency, delinquency, or transition jurisdiction, the nonminor dependent shall remain under the general jurisdiction of the court in order to allow for a petition under subdivision
 (e) of Section 388.

(c) A nonminor who has not yet attained 21 years of age and who exited foster care at or after the age of majority, may petition the court pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 to resume dependency jurisdiction over themselves or to assume transition jurisdiction over themselves pursuant to Section 450.

(d) (1) Nothing in this code, including, but not limited to, Sections 340, 366.27, and 369.5, shall be construed to provide legal custody of a person who has attained 18 years of age to the county welfare or probation department or to otherwise abrogate any other rights that a person who has attained 18 years of age may have as an adult under California law. A nonminor dependent shall retain all of their legal decisionmaking
 authority as an adult. The nonminor shall enter into a mutual agreement for placement, as described in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, unless the nonminor dependent is incapable of making an informed agreement, or a voluntary reentry agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, for placement and care in which the nonminor consents to placement and care in a setting supervised by, and under the responsibility of, the county child welfare services department, the county probation department, or Indian tribe, tribal organization, or consortium of tribes that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1.

(2) A nonminor dependent who remains under delinquency jurisdiction in order to complete their rehabilitative goals and is under a foster care placement order is not required to complete the mutual
 agreement as described in subdivision (u) of Section 11400. Their adult decisionmaking authority may be limited by and subject to the care, supervision, custody, conduct, and maintenance orders as described in Section 727.

(e) Unless otherwise specified, the rights of a dependent child and the responsibilities of the county welfare or probation department, or tribe, and other entities, toward the child and family, shall also apply to nonminor dependents.

(f) The court shall assume transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 450 over a person notwithstanding a court order vacating or dismissing the underlying adjudication pursuant to Section 236.14 of the Penal Code or Section 782 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 782, Sec. 2.   (SB 1161)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

304.

After a petition has been filed pursuant to Section 311, and until the time that the petition is dismissed or dependency is terminated, no other division of any superior court may hear proceedings pursuant to Part 2 (commencing with Section 3020) of Division 8 of the Family Code regarding the custody of the child or proceedings under Part 2 (commencing with Section 1500) of Division 4 of the Probate Code, except as otherwise authorized in this code, regarding the establishment of a guardianship for the child. While the child is under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court all issues regarding his or her custody shall be heard by the juvenile court. In deciding issues between the parents or between a parent and a guardian regarding custody of a child who has been adjudicated a dependent of the juvenile court, the juvenile court may review any records that would be available to the domestic relations division of a superior court hearing that matter. The juvenile court, on its own motion, may issue an order as provided for in Section 213.5, or as described in Section 6218 of the Family Code. The Judicial Council shall adopt forms for these restraining orders. These form orders shall not be confidential and shall be enforceable in the same manner as any other order issued pursuant to Division 10 (commencing with Section 6200) of the Family Code.

This section shall not be construed to divest the domestic relations division of a superior court from hearing any issues regarding the custody of a child when that child is no longer a dependent of the juvenile court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1054, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

304.7.

(a) The Judicial Council shall develop and implement standards for the education and training of all judges who conduct hearings pursuant to Section 300. The training shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) A component relating to Section 300 proceedings for newly appointed or elected judges and an annual training session in Section 300 proceedings.

(2) Cultural competency and sensitivity relating to, and best practices for, providing adequate care to lesbian, gay, bisexual, and transgender youth.

(3) The information described in subdivision (d) of Section 16501.4.

(4) The information described in subdivision (i) of Section 16521.5.

(b) A commissioner or referee who is assigned to conduct hearings held pursuant to Section 300 shall meet the minimum standards for education and training established pursuant to subdivision (a), by July 31, 1998.

(c) The Judicial Council shall submit an annual report to the Legislature on compliance by judges, commissioners, and referees with the education and training standards described in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 24, Sec. 10.   (SB 89)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Dependent Children—Temporary Custody and Detention [305. - 324.5.]

305.

Any peace officer may, without a warrant, take into temporary custody a minor:

(a) When the officer has reasonable cause for believing that the minor is a person described in Section 300, and, in addition, that the minor has an immediate need for medical care, or the minor is in immediate danger of physical or sexual abuse, or the physical environment or the fact that the child is left unattended poses an immediate threat to the child’s health or safety. In cases in which the child is left unattended, the peace officer shall first attempt to contact the child’s parent or guardian to determine if the parent or guardian is able to assume custody of the child. If the parent or guardian cannot be contacted, the peace officer shall notify a social worker in the county welfare department to assume custody of the child.

(b) Who is in a hospital and release of the minor to a parent poses an immediate danger to the child’s health or safety.

(c) Who is a dependent child of the juvenile court, or concerning whom an order has been made under Section 319, when the officer has reasonable cause for believing that the minor has violated an order of the juvenile court or has left any placement ordered by the juvenile court.

(d) Who is found in any street or public place suffering from any sickness or injury which requires care, medical treatment, hospitalization, or other remedial care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1075, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

305.5.

(a) In any Indian child custody proceeding as defined by Section 224.1, the court shall determine the child’s residence and domicile as defined in Section 224.1 and in the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(b) If at any stage of an Indian child custody proceeding as defined in Section 224.1 and in Section 1903 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, the court receives information from the child welfare agency or any other source that suggests an Indian child is already a ward of a tribal court or resides or is domiciled within a reservation of an Indian tribe that has exclusive jurisdiction over child custody proceedings, as recognized in Section 1911 of Title 25 of the United States Code, or reassumed exclusive
 jurisdiction over Indian child custody proceedings pursuant to Section 1918 of Title 25 of the United States Code, the state court shall expeditiously notify the tribe and the tribal court of the pending dismissal based on the tribe’s exclusive jurisdiction. The notification shall advise the tribe that the state court will dismiss the child custody proceeding upon receiving confirmation from the tribe that the child is a ward of a tribal court or subject to the tribe’s exclusive jurisdiction.

(c) Unless otherwise agreed upon by the state and the tribe pursuant to Section 1919 of Title 25 of the United States Code, upon receipt of confirmation that the child is already a ward of a tribal court or is subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of an Indian tribe as described in subdivision (b), the state court shall dismiss the child custody proceeding and ensure that the tribal court is sent all information regarding the proceeding, including, but not
 limited to, the pleadings and any state court record. If the local agency has not already transferred physical custody of the Indian child to the child’s tribe, the state court shall order that the local agency do so forthwith and hold in abeyance any dismissal order pending confirmation that the Indian child is in the physical custody of the tribe. This subdivision does not preclude a state court from ordering an Indian child detained on an emergency basis pursuant to Section 319 if emergency removal is necessary to protect the child from imminent physical damage or harm and if more time is needed to facilitate the transfer of custody of the Indian child from the county welfare department to the tribe.

(d) In the case of an Indian child who is not a ward of a tribal court or subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of an Indian tribe, as described in subdivision (b), the state court shall transfer the proceeding to the jurisdiction of the child’s
 tribe upon petition of either parent, the Indian custodian, or the child’s tribe, unless the state court finds good cause not to transfer. The petition for transfer may be made orally on the record or in writing at any stage of the proceedings. Upon receipt of a petition for transfer, the state court shall terminate jurisdiction only after receiving confirmation that the tribal court has accepted the transfer. At the time that the state court terminates jurisdiction, the state court shall also do both of the following:

(1) Expeditiously provide the tribal court with all records related to the proceeding, including, but not limited to, the pleadings and any state court record.

(2) Work with the tribal court to ensure that the transfer of the child and of the proceeding is accomplished smoothly and in a way that minimizes the disruption of services to the family.

(e) (1) If a petition to transfer proceedings as described in subdivision (d) is made orally on the record or in writing, the state court shall find good cause to deny the petition if either of the following circumstances are shown to exist:

(A) One or both of the child’s parents object to the transfer.

(B) The tribal court of the child’s tribe declines the transfer.

(2) In determining whether good cause exists to deny a transfer, the state court shall not consider any of the following:

(A) Socioeconomic conditions and the perceived adequacy of tribal social services or judicial systems.

(B) Whether the
 child custody proceeding is at an advanced stage if the Indian child’s parent, Indian custodian, or tribe did not receive notice of the child custody proceeding until an advanced stage. It shall not, in and of itself, be considered an unreasonable delay for a party to wait until reunification efforts have failed and reunification services have been terminated before filing a petition to transfer.

(C) Whether there have been prior proceedings involving the child for which no transfer petition was filed.

(D) Whether the transfer could affect the placement of the child.

(E) Whether the Indian child has cultural connections with the tribe or its reservation.

(3) The burden of establishing good cause not to transfer shall be on the party opposing the
 transfer. If the state court believes, or any party asserts, that good cause not to transfer exists, the reasons for that belief or assertion shall be stated orally on the record or in writing and made available to all parties who are petitioning for the transfer, and the petitioner shall have the opportunity to provide information or evidence in rebuttal of the belief or assertion.

 (4) This section and Sections 1911 and 1918 of Title 25 of the United States Code shall not be construed as requiring a tribe to petition the Secretary of the Interior to reassume exclusive jurisdiction pursuant to Section 1918 of Title 25 of the United States Code prior to exercising jurisdiction over a proceeding transferred under subdivision (d).

(f) If any petitioner in an Indian child custody proceeding has improperly removed the child from the custody of the parent or Indian custodian or has
 improperly retained custody after a visit or other temporary relinquishment of custody, the state court shall decline jurisdiction over the petition and shall immediately return the child to his or her parent or Indian custodian, unless retaining the child outside the custody of his or her parent or Indian custodian is necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm.

(g) This section shall not be construed to prevent the emergency removal of an Indian child who is a ward of a tribal court or resides or is domiciled within a reservation of an Indian tribe that has exclusive jurisdiction over child custody proceedings, but is temporarily located off the reservation, from a parent or Indian custodian or the emergency placement of the child in a foster home or institution in order to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child. The state or local authority shall ensure that the emergency removal or placement terminates immediately
 when the removal or placement is no longer necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the child and shall expeditiously initiate an Indian child custody proceeding, transfer the child to the jurisdiction of the Indian child’s tribe, or restore the child to the parent or Indian custodian, as may be appropriate.

(h) When an Indian child is transferred from a state court to an Indian tribe pursuant to subdivision (c), (d), or (g), the county shall, pursuant to Section 827.15, release the child case file to the tribe having jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 17.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

305.6.

(a) Any peace officer may, without a warrant, take into temporary custody a child who is in a hospital if the release of the child to a prospective adoptive parent or a representative of a licensed adoption agency poses an immediate danger to the child’s health or safety.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and Section 305, a peace officer shall not, without a warrant, take into temporary custody a child who is in a hospital if all of the following conditions exist:

(1) The child is a newborn who tested positive for illegal drugs or whose birth mother tested positive for illegal drugs.

(2) The child is the subject of a proposed adoption
 and a Health Facility Minor Release Report, developed by the department, has been completed by the hospital, including the marking of the boxes applicable to an independent adoption or agency adoption planning, and signed by the placing birth parent or birth parents, as well as either the prospective adoptive parent or parents or an authorized representative of a licensed adoption agency, prior to the discharge of the birth parent or the child from the hospital. The Health Facility Minor Release Report shall include a notice written in at least 14-point pica type, containing substantially all of the following statements:

(A) That the Health Facility Minor Release Report does not constitute consent to adoption of the child by the prospective adoptive parent or parents, or any other person.

(B) That the Health Facility Minor Release Report does not constitute a relinquishment of
 parental rights for the purposes of adoption.

(C) That the birth parent or parents or any person authorized by the birth parent or parents may reclaim the child at any time from the prospective adoptive parent or parents or any other person to whom the child was released by the hospital, as provided in Section 8700, 8814.5, or 8815 of the Family Code.

(3) The release of the child to a prospective adoptive parent or parents or an authorized representative of a licensed adoption agency does not pose an immediate danger to the child.

(4) An attorney or an adoption agency has provided documentation stating that he or she, or the agency, is representing the prospective adoptive parent or parents for purposes of the adoption. In the case of an independent adoption, as defined in Section 8524 of the Family Code, the
 attorney or adoption agency shall provide documentation stating that the prospective adoptive parent or parents have been informed that the child may be eligible for benefits provided pursuant to the Adoption Assistance Program, as set forth in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4 of Division 9, only if, at the time the adoption request is filed, the child has met the requirements to receive federal supplemental security income benefits pursuant to Subchapter XVI (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, as determined and documented by the federal Social Security Administration.

(5) The prospective adoptive parent or parents or their representative, or an authorized representative of a licensed adoption agency, provides all of the following to the peace officer:

(A) A fully executed copy of the Health Facility Minor Release
 Report.

(B) A written form signed by either the prospective adoptive parent or parents or a representative of the licensed adoption agency, which shall include all of the following:

(i) A statement that the child is the subject of a proposed adoption.

(ii) A declaration that the signer or signers will immediately notify the county child welfare agency pursuant to Section 11165.9 of the Penal Code if the adoption plan is terminated for any reason, and will not release the child to the birth parent or parents or any designee of the birth parent or parents until the county child welfare agency or local law enforcement agency completes an investigation and determines that release of the child to the birth parent or parents or a designee of the birth parent or parents will not create an immediate risk to the health or
 safety of the child.

(iii) An agreement to provide a conformed copy of the adoption request or guardianship petition to the county child welfare agency within five business days after filing.

(iv) The names, identifying information, and contact information for the child, for each prospective adoptive parent, and for each birth parent, to the extent that information is known. In the case of an agency adoption where no prospective adoptive parent or parents are identified at the time of the child’s release from the hospital, the licensed adoption agency may provide the information as it pertains to the licensed or certified foster home into which the agency intends to place the child.

(c) (1) In every independent adoption proceeding under this section, the prospective adoptive parent or parents
 shall file with the court either an adoption request within 10 working days after execution of an adoption placement agreement, or a guardianship petition within 30 calendar days after the child’s discharge from the hospital, whichever is earlier.

(2) If the adoption plan for a child who was released from the hospital pursuant to subdivision (b) is terminated for any reason, the prospective adoptive parent or parents or licensed adoption agency shall immediately notify the county child welfare agency. The prospective adoptive parent or parents or licensed adoption agency may not release the child into the physical custody of the birth parent or parents, or any designee of the birth parent or parents, until the county child welfare agency or local law enforcement agency completes an investigation and determines that release of the child to the birth parent or parents or a designee of the birth parent or parents will not create an immediate risk
 to the health or safety of the child.

(d) Upon request by a birth parent or parents of the newborn child, the appropriate hospital personnel shall complete a Health Facility Minor Release Report and provide copies of the report to the birth parent or parents, and the person or persons who will receive physical custody of the child upon discharge pursuant to Section 1283 of the Health and Safety Code. Hospital personnel shall not refuse to complete a Health Facility Minor Release Report for any reason, even if the child is ineligible for release at that time. This section shall not be construed to require hospital personnel to release a child contrary to the directives of a child welfare agency.

(e) This section is not intended to create a duty that requires law enforcement to investigate the prospective adoptive parent or parents.

(f) This section does not suspend the requirements for voluntary adoptive placement under the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 833, Sec. 18.   (AB 3176)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

306.

(a) Any social worker in a county welfare department, or in an Indian tribe that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 while acting within the scope of their regular duties under the direction of the juvenile court and pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 272, may do all of the following:

(1) Receive and maintain, pending investigation, temporary custody of a child who is described in Section 300, and who has been delivered by a peace
 officer.

(2) Take into and maintain temporary custody of, without a warrant, a child who has been declared a dependent child of the juvenile court under Section 300 or who the social worker has reasonable cause to believe is a person described in subdivision (b) or (g) of Section 300, and the social worker has reasonable cause to believe that the child has an immediate need for medical care or is in immediate danger of physical or sexual abuse or the physical environment poses an immediate threat to the child’s health or safety.

(b) Upon receiving temporary custody of a child pursuant to subdivision (a), the county welfare department shall inquire pursuant to Section 224.2, whether the child is or may be an Indian child.

(c) If it is known or if there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, any county social worker in a county welfare department may take into custody, and maintain temporary custody of, without a warrant, the Indian child if removing the child from the physical custody of their parent, parents, or Indian custodian is necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the Indian child. The temporary custody shall be considered an emergency removal under subdivision (g) of Section 305.5 and Section 1922 of the federal Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.).

(d) If a county social worker takes an Indian child into or maintains an Indian child
 in temporary custody under subdivision (a), and the social worker knows or has reason to believe the Indian child is already a ward of a tribal court, or resides or is domiciled within a reservation of an Indian tribe that has exclusive jurisdiction over child custody proceedings as recognized in
 Section 305.5 or reassumed exclusive jurisdiction over Indian child custody proceedings, the county welfare agency shall notify the tribe that the child was taken into temporary custody no later than the next working day and shall provide all relevant documentation to the tribe regarding the temporary custody and the child’s identity. If the tribe determines that the child is an Indian child who is already a ward of a tribal court or who is subject to the tribe’s exclusive jurisdiction, the county welfare agency shall transfer custody of the child to the tribe within 24 hours after learning of the tribe’s determination.

(e) If the social worker is unable to confirm that an Indian child is a ward of a tribal court or subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of an Indian tribe as described in subdivision (d), or is unable to transfer
 custody of the Indian child to the child’s tribe, prior to the expiration of the period permitted by subdivision (a) of Section 313 for filing a petition to declare the Indian child a dependent of the juvenile court, the county welfare agency shall file the petition. The county welfare agency shall inform the state court in its report for the hearing pursuant to Section 319, that the Indian child may be a ward of a tribal court or subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the child’s tribe. If the child welfare agency receives confirmation that an Indian child is a ward of a tribal court or subject to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Indian child’s tribe between the time of filing a petition and the initial petition hearing, the agency shall inform the state court, provide a copy of the written confirmation, if any, and move to dismiss the petition. This subdivision does not prevent the court from
 authorizing a state or local agency to maintain temporary custody of the Indian child for a period not to exceed 30 days in order to arrange for the Indian child to be placed in the custody of the child’s tribe.

(f) Before taking a child into custody, a social worker shall consider whether the child may remain safely in their residence. The consideration of whether the child may remain safely at home shall include, but not be limited to, the following factors:

(1) Whether there are any reasonable services available to the worker which, if provided to the child’s parent, guardian, caretaker, or to the child would eliminate the need to remove the child from the custody of their parent, guardian, Indian custodian, or other caretaker.

(2) Whether a referral to public assistance pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 17000) of Part 5, and Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6, of Division 9 would eliminate the need to take temporary custody of the child. If those services are available they shall be utilized.

(3) Whether a nonoffending caretaker can provide for and protect the child from abuse and neglect and whether the alleged perpetrator voluntarily agrees to withdraw from the residence, withdraws from the residence, and is likely to remain withdrawn from the residence.

(4) If it is known or there is reason to know the child is an Indian child, the county social worker
 shall make active efforts to provide remedial services and rehabilitative programs designed to prevent the breakup of the Indian family prior to removal from the custody of a parent or parents or Indian custodian unless emergency removal is necessary to prevent imminent physical damage or harm to the Indian child.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 9.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

306.5.

In any case in which a social worker takes a minor into custody pursuant to Section 306, the social worker shall, to the extent that it is practical and appropriate, place the minor together with any siblings or half-siblings who are also detained or include in the report prepared pursuant to Section 319 a statement of his or her continuing efforts to place the siblings together or why those efforts are not appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 747, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

306.6.

(a) In a dependency proceeding involving a child who would otherwise be an Indian child, based on the definition contained in subdivision (b) of Section 224.1, but is not an Indian child based on the child’s Indian tribe not having federal recognition, as described by paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 224.1, the court may permit the tribe from which the child is descended to participate in the proceeding upon request of the tribe.

(b) If the court permits a tribe to participate in a proceeding, the tribe may do all of the following, upon consent of the court:

(1) Be present at the hearing or appear remotely as authorized by subdivision (l) of Section 224.2.

(2) Address the court.

(3) Request and receive notice of hearings.

(4) Request to examine court documents relating to the proceeding.

(5) Present information to the court that is relevant to the proceeding.

(6) Submit written reports and recommendations to the court.

(7) Perform other duties and responsibilities as requested or approved by the court.

(c) If more
 than one tribe requests to participate in a proceeding under subdivision (a), the court may limit participation to the tribe with which the child has the most significant contacts, as determined in accordance with the provisions for determining an Indian child’s tribe contained in subdivision (e) of Section 224.1.

(d) This section is intended to assist the court in making decisions that are in the best interest of the child by permitting a tribe in the circumstances set out in subdivision (a) to inform the court and parties to the proceeding about placement options for the child within the child’s extended family or the tribal community, services and programs available to the child and the child’s parents as Indians, and other unique interests the child or the child’s parents may have as Indians. This section shall not be construed
 to make the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978 (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.), or any state law implementing the Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978, applicable to the proceedings, or to limit the court’s discretion to permit other interested persons to participate in these or any other proceedings.

(e) The court shall, on a case-by-case basis, make a determination if this section is applicable and may request information from the tribe, or the entity claiming to be a tribe, from which the child is descended for the purposes of making this determination, if the child would otherwise be an Indian child pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 10.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

307.

A peace officer or probation officer who takes a minor into temporary custody under the provisions of Section 305 shall thereafter proceed as follows:

(a) The officer may release the minor.

(b) The officer may prepare in duplicate a written notice for the parent or parents of the minor to appear with the minor before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken into custody at a time and place specified in the notice. The notice shall also contain a concise statement of the reasons the minor was taken into custody. The officer shall deliver one copy of the notice to the minor and a parent, guardian, or responsible relative of the minor and may require the minor and the parent, guardian, or relative to sign a written promise that he or she shall appear at the time and place designated in the notice. Upon the execution of the promise to appear, the officer shall immediately release the minor. The officer shall, as soon as practicable, file one copy of the notice with the probation officer.

(c) The officer may take the minor without unnecessary delay before the probation officer of the county in which the minor was taken into custody, or in which the minor resides, or in which the acts take place or the circumstances exist which are alleged to bring the minor within the provisions of Section 300, and deliver the minor into the custody of the probation officer.

In determining which disposition of the minor shall be made, the officer shall give preference to the alternative which least interferes with the parents’ or guardians’ custody of the minor if this alternative is compatible with the safety of the minor. The officer shall also consider the needs of the minor for the least restrictive environment and the protective needs of the community.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 5.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

307.4.

(a) Any peace officer, probation officer, or social worker who takes into temporary custody pursuant to Sections 305 to 307, inclusive, a minor who comes within the description of Section 300 shall immediately inform, through the most efficient means available, the parent, guardian, or responsible relative, that the minor has been taken into protective custody and that a written statement is available which explains the parent’s or guardian’s procedural rights and the preliminary stages of the dependency investigation and hearing. The Judicial Council shall, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, adopt a form for the written statement, which shall be in simple language and shall be printed and distributed by the county. The written statement shall be made available for distribution through all public schools, probation offices, and appropriate welfare offices. It shall include, but is not limited to, the following information:

(1) The conditions under which the minor will be released, hearings which may be required, and the means whereby further specific information about the minor’s case and conditions of confinement may be obtained.

(2) The rights to counsel, privileges against self-incrimination, and rights to appeal possessed by the minor, and his or her parents, guardians, or responsible relative.

(b) If a good faith attempt was made at notification, the failure on the part of the peace officer, probation officer, or social worker to notify the parent or guardian that the written information required by subdivision (a) is available shall be considered to be due to circumstances beyond the control of the peace officer, probation officer, or social worker, and shall not be construed to permit a new defense to any juvenile or judicial proceeding or to interfere with any rights, procedures, or investigations accorded under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 386, Sec. 1.)